Hawaii statutes.
[§658G-22]
Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.
This chapter modifies, limits, and supersedes the federal Electronic Signatures
in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. section 7001 et seq., but does
not modify, limit, or supersede section 101(c) of that Act, 15 U.S.C.A. section
7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in
section 103(b) of that Act, 15 U.S.C.A. section 7003(b). [L 2012, c 207, pt of
§1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next